Utah statutes.
53A-6-202.   Purpose and intent of compact -- Findings.

(1)  The states party to this compact, desiring by common action to improve their respective school systems by utilizing the teacher or other professional educational person wherever educated, declare that it is the policy of each of them, on the basis of cooperation with one another, to take advantage of the preparation and experience of such persons wherever gained, thereby serving the best interests of society, of education, and of the teaching profession.  It is the purpose of this compact to provide for the development and execution of such programs of cooperation as will facilitate the movement of teachers and other professional educational personnel among the states party to it, and to authorize specific interstate educational personnel contracts to achieve that end.

(2)  The party states find that included in the large movement of population among all sections of the nation are many qualified educational personnel who move for family and other personal reasons but who are hindered in using their professional skill and experience in their new locations.  Variations from state to state in requirements for qualifying educational personnel discourage such personnel from taking the steps necessary to qualify in other states.  As a consequence, a significant number of professionally prepared and experienced educators is lost to our school systems.  Facilitating the employment of qualified educational personnel, without reference to their states of origin, can increase the available educational resources.  Participation in this compact can increase the availability of educational manpower.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

